Utah statutes.
9-7-313.   Law library self-help center.

(1)  The Utah State Law Library shall establish a statewide self-help center to assist self-represented parties to achieve fair and efficient resolution of their cases.

(2)  The self-help center shall be staffed or directed by persons admitted to the practice of law in this state.  Self-help center personnel may not represent parties or give legal advice.

(3)  The self-help center shall provide to the public and all parties:

(a)  information about:

(i)  the availability of mediation services, and legal advice and representation through pro bono legal services;

(ii)  low cost legal services;

(iii)  legal aid programs; and

(iv)  lawyer referral services;

(b)  information about resources provided by law libraries;

(c)  court forms and instructions, and help completing forms;

(d)  answers to questions about the law, court process, and options; and

(e)  educational materials and other services consistent with the purpose of this statute and the direction of the Judicial Council, including programs in other agencies and organizations.

